Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-123
Highway Historical Markers; erection or maintenance; written consent of Nebraska State Historical Society required.

It shall be unlawful for any person, public or private corporation, association, or organization to post, erect, or maintain any historical marker, monument, sign or notice, on public property or any place in the state, upon any public street, road, or highway in the state bearing any legend, inscription, or notice which purports to record any historical event, incident, or fact or to maintain any such historical marker, monument, notice, or sign posted or erected after September 20, 1957, unless a written certificate of approval has first been secured from the Historical Land Mark Council or, after December 25, 1969, from the Nebraska State Historical Society.

Laws 1957, c. 384, § 5, p. 1340;

Laws 1959, c. 441, § 6, p. 1484;

R.R.S.1943, § 82-205;

Laws 1969, c. 811, § 5, p. 3049.